Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,130.06
Historical vehicle; transfer of registration and license plates; authorized; fee.

A collector, upon loss of possession of a historical vehicle registered pursuant to section 60-3,130, may have the registration and license plate transferred to another vehicle in his or her possession, which is eligible for such registration, upon payment of a fee of twenty-five dollars. The fee shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Highway Trust Fund.

Laws 2006, LB 663, § 30.